Hawaii statutes.
§286-245 Driving record information to be
recorded and furnished. (a) Whenever a person is convicted of a moving
traffic violation based on a statute, ordinance, or rule, fails to appear for a
hearing, trial, or other court or administrative proceeding on the moving
traffic violation, or fails to pay a fine or court cost ordered for a moving
violation, the state judiciary shall forward to the examiner of drivers the
record of the conviction. The record of conviction shall include whether the
offender was operating a commercial motor vehicle at the time of the offense,
whether the offender was transporting hazardous materials requiring placarding
under title 49 Code of Federal Regulations part 172, subpart F, the citation
date, the conviction date, the citation number, the court in which the
conviction occurred, and the offenses for which the person has been convicted.
No record of conviction transmitted and maintained in the statewide traffic
records system shall be used for purposes other than the licensing of drivers,
including any record of:

(1) Driving a motor vehicle under the influence of
alcohol, a controlled substance, or any drug that impairs driving ability;

(2) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the
alcohol concentration of the driver's blood is 0.04 or more grams of alcohol
per two hundred ten liters of breath or 0.04 or more grams of alcohol per one
hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood;

(3) Refusing to submit to a test to determine the
driver's alcohol concentration while driving a motor vehicle as required under
sections 286-243 and 291E-11;

(4) Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any
felony;

(5) Leaving the scene of an accident involving the
motor vehicle driven by the person;

(6) Unlawful transportation, possession, or use of a
controlled substance while on duty;

(7) Driving a commercial motor vehicle if, as a
result of prior violations committed while operating a commercial motor
vehicle, the driver's commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license
has been revoked, suspended, or canceled, or the driver has been otherwise
disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle; or

(8) Causing a fatality through the operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including in the commission of the crimes of
manslaughter and negligent homicide in any degree.

(b) Within ten days of an in-state conviction
and within ten days of the receipt of notice of an out-of-state conviction, the
examiner of drivers shall record and maintain as part of the driver's record:

(1) All convictions, disqualifications, and other
licensing actions for violations in this State and out-of-state, of any law
relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation,
committed in any type of vehicle, by a holder of a commercial learner's permit
or a commercial driver's license; and

(2) All convictions, disqualifications, and other
licensing actions for violations in this State and out-of-state, of any law
relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation,
committed while the driver was operating a commercial motor vehicle and was
required to have a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license.

(c) No commercial learner's permit or
commercial driver's license driver's conviction for any violation in any type
of motor vehicle of a state or local traffic control law, except a parking
violation, shall be expunged or subject to deferred imposition of judgment nor
shall an individual be allowed to enter into a diversion program that would
prevent the conviction from appearing on the driver's driving record, whether
the driver was convicted for an offense committed in this State or another
state.

(d) The state judiciary and the examiner of
drivers shall make available to the greatest extent possible information from
any driver's record required for enforcement of this section to the users
designated in subsection (f) or their authorized agent, within ten days of:

(1) Receiving the conviction or disqualification
information from another state; or

(2) Receiving the conviction information for a
violation occurring in this State.

(e) All convictions, disqualifications, and
other licensing actions for violations shall be retained on each driver's
record for at least three years or longer if required under title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations section 384.231(d).

(f) Only the following users or their
authorized agents may obtain a driver's record:

(1) States may receive all information regarding any
driver's record;

(2) The Secretary of Transportation may receive all
information regarding any driver's record;

(3) A driver may receive only information related to
that driver's record; and

(4) A motor carrier employer or prospective motor
carrier employer may receive all information regarding an employee driver's
driving record, or the driving record of a prospective employee driver;
provided that the request is made by the driver.

(g) The traffic violations bureaus of the
district courts, upon request, shall furnish users designated in subsection (f)
with a certified driver record listing all convictions, disqualifications, and
licensing actions in this State and notification of any action received from
other states that are recorded and maintained by the examiner of drivers. The
traffic violations bureaus shall collect a fee for requests by users designated
in subsection (f)(3) and (4), not to exceed $9, of which $5 shall be deposited
into the general fund, $2 shall be deposited into the judiciary computer system
special fund, and $2 shall be deposited into the highway fund.

(h) Beginning January 30, 2012, the examiner
of drivers shall:

(1) Post on the commercial driver's license
information system and maintain as part of the driver's record the driver's
self-certification of type of driving under title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations section 383.71(a)(1)(ii);

(2) Retain for at least three years after the date of
issuance the original or a copy of the medical certificate of any driver
required to provide documentation of physical qualification;

(3) Post within ten calendar days the information
from the medical examiner's certificate to the commercial driver's license
information system driver record, including:

(A) The medical examiner's name;

(B) The medical examiner's telephone number;

(C) The date of issuance of the medical
examiner's certificate;

(D) The medical examiner's license number and
the state that issued it;

(E) The medical examiner's number issued by
the national registry of medical examiners as required under title 49 United
States Code section 31149(d);

(F) The driver's medical certification status
as certified or not-certified;

(G) The expiration date of the medical
examiner's certificate;

(H) The existence of any medical variance on
the medical certificate, such as an exemption or skill performance evaluation;

(I) Any restrictions including corrective
lenses, hearing aids, or a requirement to have possession of an exemption
letter or skill performance evaluation certificate while on duty; and

(J) The date the medical examiner's
certificate information was posted to the commercial driver's license
information system driver record; and

(4) Record the commercial driver's license downgrade
within sixty days of the driver's medical certification status becoming
not-certified to operate a commercial driver's license. [L 1989, c 320, pt of
§2; am L 1990, c 342, §15; am L 1993, c 268, §8; am L 1995, c 114, §8; am L
2004, c 103, §11; am L 2006, c 130, §9; am L 2011, c 121, §7; am L 2013, c 114,
§15]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next